Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5242YH (8) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2043 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 2.34 Membership in professional 1 organizations ââ dues payments. 2 1. The general assembly shall not pay membership dues to 3 a professional organization on behalf of all members of the 4 general assembly, including but not limited to the national 5 conference of state legislatures or the council of state 6 governments. 7 2. The general assembly shall, on an annual basis, calculate 8 the amount of dues that the general assembly would pay for 9 membership in the national conference of state legislatures and 10 the council of state governments and equally distribute the 11 same amount of moneys to the members of the general assembly. 12 A member of the general assembly shall only expend these 13 moneys for the purpose of joining the national conference 14 of state legislatures, the council of state governments, 15 the American legislative exchange council, the national 16 association of Christian lawmakers, Americans for prosperity, 17 the education freedom alliance, the heritage foundation, the 18 state legislative leaders foundation, the state policy network, 19 the states project, or women in government. 20 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect upon the 21 convening of the first session of the Ninety-second General 22 Assembly. 23